District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.09

Delegation of Council authority to issue bonds.

The Council delegates to the Authority the power of the Council under § 1-204.90, as amended by section 11508 of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (P.L. 105-33; 111 Stat. 773), to issue revenue bonds, notes, and other obligations to finance, refinance, or assist in the financing or refinancing of any undertakings of the new convention center and the new convention center hotel pursuant to this chapter or to finance, refinance, or assist in the financing or refinancing of the construction of, or capital improvements to, any District sports and entertainment facility.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 209, 41 DCR 5333
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 2(g), 45 DCR 4826
Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 114(c), 53 DCR 5430
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2081(m), 57 DCR 181

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-1202.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-810.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-163 substituted “New Convention Center and the new convention center hotel” for “New Convention Center”.
D.C. Law 18-111 substituted “new convention center” for “New Convention Center” and substituted “this chapter or to finance, refinance, or assist in the financing or refinancing of the construction of, or capital improvements to, any District sports and entertainment facility” for “this chapter”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 114(c) of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(m) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(m) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Effective Dates

For effective date of D.C. Law 12-142, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1202.01.